New York, session 2025-2026, A7943.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 425 of the real property tax law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-1) to read as follows: 3 (e-1) Dwellings owned by certain limited liability companies. If legal 4 title to a dwelling is held by a single-member limited liability compa- 5 ny, the exemption shall be granted if the property serves as the primary 6 residence of the member of such limited liability company. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09758-01-5